District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.15

Serving of notice; civil penalties.

(a)

Any notice or order served upon a respondent or other person pursuant to this subchapter may be personally served, delivered to the respondent’s or other person’s last known home or business address and left with a person of suitable age and discretion residing or employed therein, or mailed to the respondent or other person by first-class mail to the respondent or other person’s last known home or business address. When service is by mail, 5 additional days shall be added to the time period in the notice or order within which the respondent or other person may, or is required to, take any action specified in the notice order.

(b)

Any violation of this subchapter or implementing rule is punishable by a civil penalty not to exceed $25,000 for each day of each offense. Each day a violation continues shall be deemed a separate offense.

(c)

Civil infraction fines, penalties, and fees may be imposed as alternative sanctions for any infraction of the provisions of this subchapter or the rules issued under this subchapter pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801 et seq.]. Adjudication of any infractions shall be pursuant to Chapter 18 of Title 2 [§ 2-1801 et seq.].

(d)

In determining the severity of a civil penalty under subsection (a) of this section, the Superior Court of the District of Columbia shall take into account the nature, circumstances, extent, gravity, actual or potential harm to the environment, and actual or potential harm to human health, of the violation or violations and, with respect to the violator, ability to pay, any history of prior such violations, the degree of culpability, and such other matters as justice may require.

(e)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may commence appropriate civil action in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia to secure a temporary restraining order, a preliminary injunction, a permanent injunction, or other appropriate relief to enforce compliance with the provisions of this subchapter.

(f)

As specified by the Mayor in rulemaking, a person adversely affected by an action taken pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, or the rules or regulations promulgated pursuant to this subchapter, is entitled to a hearing before the Mayor upon filing with the Mayor, within 15 calendar days of such action, a written request for a hearing. The hearing shall be held in accordance with § 2-509.

History

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 16, 56 DCR 1596
Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-348, § 2(k), 58 DCR 717

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-231.05.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-348 rewrote subsec. (a), which had read as follows: “(a) Any notice required by this chapter may be served upon an owner of the dwelling or agent of the owner in the same manner as a summons in a civil action or by registered or certified mail to his or her last known address or place of residence.”